lexd_components/verbs_paradigms.lexd
#!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
#!!!  M O R P H O T A C T I C S  !!!
#!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

##TO DO, double check   

#Unclear if Aor should be tagged as aorist or nothing, because it's sometimes meaningless

#Develop complex tenses with onstraint Grammar TO DO

#TO DO Valency morphology (passive, causative, inchoative)
# Theme-less causatives, maybe tags or columns
# Maybe the nil group shouldnt get a causative version? or cil class
# lexical caus/passives can get their own lexical entry
#via https://wiki.apertium.org/wiki/Word_sense_disambiguation and Lexical Selection

# TO DO use postdix (post-generator) to figure out how to get ci -> c'
#https://wiki.apertium.org/wiki/Post-generator
#Could use post-dix to do indicative too

#TO DO: gbcil is an incomplete paradigm in Boyacioglu but it has more entries in EANC
#TO DO check for paradigm leveling of irregular nil/cil in imperatives to get aorist (EANC)


# TO DO double check defectives
#-ul, ucanel,prohibitive and others (though low priority)
#15 Cil prohibtive, negativ present/imperfect,evid,subj
#15 16 difference in Imperative

#Not sure if participles should count as verbal TO DO
#because they feel verbal, but can also act as nouns/adjectives 


#!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
#!!!  M O R P H O T A C T I C S  !!!
#!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!


#Unclear if Aor should be tagged as aorist or nothing, because it's sometimes meaningless

#Develop complex tenses with onstraint Grammar TO DO

#TO DO Valency morphology (passive, causative, inchoative)
# Theme-less causatives, maybe tags or columns
# Maybe the nil group shouldnt get a causative version? or cil class
# lexical caus/passives can get their own lexical entry
#via https://wiki.apertium.org/wiki/Word_sense_disambiguation and Lexical Selection

# TO DO use postdix (post-generator) to figure out how to get ci -> c'
#https://wiki.apertium.org/wiki/Post-generator
#Could use post-dix to do indicative too

#TO DO: gbcil is an incomplete paradigm in Boyacioglu but it has more entries in EANC
#TO DO check for paradigm leveling of irregular nil/cil in imperatives to get aorist (EANC)


# TO DO double check defectives
#15 Cil prohibtive, negativ present/imperfect,evid,subj
#15 16 difference in Imperative

#Add exlamation mark for imperative TO DO

#Not sure if participles should count as verbal TO DO
#because they feel verbal, but can also act as nouns/adjectives 


########################################
########################################
########################################
##### VERB paradigms
########################################
########################################
########################################
########################################


#Base of causative is root+th
PATTERN CausBase
VerbRootE VZero ThE 
VerbRootI VZero ThE #I'm just changing -i- to -e- directly
VerbRootA VZero ThA 
InchBase InchEmpty  #<inch> marked by either covert or overt -n-

CausativeVerbRoot VZero #This is for lexically listed causatives

#Base of passive is root
PATTERN PassBase
VerbRootE VZero 
VerbRootI VZero 
VerbRootA VZero ThA Aor
CausBase CausPass 
InchBase InchEmpty Aor #Should I care that this will rarely be traversed? TO DO
  
 PassiveVerbRoot  VZero #This is for lexically listed passives


#Base of inchoative is root+th or root
PATTERN InchBase
InchRootTh0 VZero
InchRootThA ThA VZero
InchRootThE ThE VZero

#Infinitival
PATTERN Infinitival
VerbRootE VZero ThE Inf
VerbRootI VZero ThI Inf
VerbRootA VZero ThA Inf
CausBase CausPres ThE Inf
PassBase Pass ThI Inf
InchBase InchNasal ThA Inf

#Archaic/obsolete
VerbRootUv VZero ThU Inf # արտահեղուլ 
VerbRootUc VZero ThU Inf # թողուլ 
VerbRootUcanel VZero ThA EmptyNasal ThE Inf  # Dir/LR # ծանուցանել , preferably part of RootE class
VerbRootNulV EmptyNasal VZero ThU Inf # երդնուլ 
VerbRootNulC EmptyNasal VZero ThU Inf # զբօսնուլ

#Irregulars
VerbRootNil EmptyNasal VZero ThI Inf # անցնիլ group from Boyacioglu
VerbRootCilV|VerbRootCilC EmptyAffr VZero ThI Inf # կպչիլ group from Boyacioglu
VerbRootNelNale EmptyNasal VZero ThE Inf #իջնել իջնալ
VerbRootNelNala EmptyNasal VZero ThA Inf 
VerbRootRiseEPres VZero ThE Inf #ելլել ելլալ
VerbRootRiseAPres VZero ThA Inf 
VerbRootCilIlc EmptyAffr VZero ThI Inf 		#դպչիլ դպիլ 
VerbRootCilIli VZero ThI Inf 		 
VerbRootCanLong EmptyNasal VZero ThA Inf #կարենալ, not կրնալ
VerbRootAppear VZero ThI Inf # Defective երեւիլ, only indicative non-perfect, no subj
VerbRootBeLongPres VZero ThA Inf # Irregular ըլլալ
VerbRootComePres VZero ThA Inf # irregular գալ եկայ
VerbRootCry VZero ThA Inf # լալ
VerbRootGivePres VZero ThA Inf # տալ
VerbRootBring VZero ThE Inf # բերել
VerbRootTurnPres VZero ThA Inf # դառնալ
VerbRootTake EmptyNasal VZero ThE Inf # առնել
VerbRootOpenPres VZero ThA Inf # բանալ
VerbRootPutPres VZero ThE Inf # դնել
VerbRootGoPres VZero ThA Inf # երթալ
VerbRootHitPres VZero ThE Inf # զարնել
VerbRootYield VZero ThI Inf # զիջիլ
VerbRootAccept VZero ThI Inf # ընդունիլ
VerbRootDoPres VZero ThE Inf # ընել
VerbRootSay VZero ThE Inf # ըսել
VerbRootSpitOldPres EmptyNasal VZero ThE Inf # թքնել
VerbRootFallPres VZero ThA Inf # իյնալ
VerbRootBite EmptyNasal VZero ThE Inf # խածնել
VerbRootPlay VZero ThA Inf # խաղալ
VerbRootStay VZero ThA Inf # մնալ
VerbRootSit VZero ThI Inf # նստիլ
VerbRootEatPres VZero ThE Inf # ուտել
VerbRootSendPres VZero ThI Inf # տանիլ

PATTERN Indicative
#Verbs with prefix
:Indc IndcSubjStem Indc:
#Including irregular monosylabic verbs that take gu-
:IndcShort IndcSubjBaseMonoStem IndcShort:

#Irregulars that lake prefix 
IndicativeIrregular

PATTERN Subjunctive
IndcSubjStem Subj0
IndcSubjBaseMonoStem Subj0

#irregulars that lack prefix in indicative
SubjunctiveIrregular


PATTERN IndcSubjStem
#Stem is base(root+th) and the agreement, no prefix or mood marking
#present
IndcSubjBase Pres0 PresAgr 
#impefect
IndcSubjBase ImpfAgr 


PATTERN IndcSubjBase
#Base of verb for regular Indicative and Subjunctive (without prefix)
#Base is root till theme vowel
#Present
VerbRootE VZero ThE 
VerbRootI VZero ThI 
VerbRootA VZero ThA 
CausBase CausPres ThE
PassBase Pass ThI 
InchBase InchNasal ThA 


VerbRootUv VZero ThU	#Unclear which one is preferred because archaic
VerbRootUv VZero ThE 
VerbRootUcanel VZero ThA EmptyNasal ThE  # Dir/LR

VerbRootNil EmptyNasal VZero ThI 
VerbRootNelNale EmptyNasal VZero ThE
VerbRootNelNala EmptyNasal VZero ThA
VerbRootRiseEPres  VZero ThE
VerbRootRiseAPres  VZero ThA
VerbRootCilIlc EmptyAffr VZero ThI 
VerbRootCilIli VZero ThI 
VerbRootBeLongPres VZero ThA 
VerbRootBring VZero ThE
VerbRootTurnPres VZero ThA
VerbRootTake EmptyNasal VZero ThE
VerbRootOpenPres VZero ThA
VerbRootPutPres VZero ThE
VerbRootGoPres VZero ThA 
VerbRootHitPres VZero ThE 
VerbRootYield VZero ThI 
VerbRootAccept VZero ThI 
VerbRootDoPres VZero ThE
VerbRootSay VZero ThE
VerbRootSpitOldPres EmptyNasal VZero ThE
VerbRootFallPres VZero ThA
VerbRootBite EmptyNasal VZero ThE 
VerbRootPlay VZero ThA
VerbRootStay VZero ThA
VerbRootSit VZero ThI
VerbRootEatPres VZero ThE
VerbRootSendPres VZero ThI


PATTERN IndcSubjBaseMonoStem
#Monosyllabic verbs which take the prefix gu-
#stem is base (root+th) and agr
IndcSubjBaseMono Pres0 PresAgr
IndcSubjBaseMono ImpfAgr 

PATTERN IndcSubjBaseMono
#Monosyllabic verbs which take the prefix gu-
#base is root and theme
VerbRootComePres VZero ThA 
VerbRootCry VZero ThA 
VerbRootGivePres VZero ThA 


PATTERN IndicativeIrregular
# I won't generalize them just ot be safe
#Some of these don't take prefix 
#Some of them don't have any subjunctive form
:Indc VerbRootCilV|VerbRootCilC EmptyAffr VZero ThI Pres0 PresAgr Indc: # երկնչիլ defective
:Indc VerbRootCilV EmptyAffr VZero ThI ImpfAgr Indc: 
VerbRootCanShort EmptyNasal VZero ThA Pres0 PresAgr Indc: 
VerbRootCanShort EmptyNasal VZero ThA ImpfAgr Indc:
:Indc VerbRootAppear VZero ThI Pres0 PresAgr Indc: # երեւիլ defective 
:Indc VerbRootAppear VZero ThI ImpfAgr Indc: #I think Boyacioglu has an error because the -i- stayed -i- here
VerbRootHave VZero ThI Pres0 PresAgr Indc: # ունիմ defective
VerbRootHave VZero ThI ImpfAgr Indc:
VerbRootKnow VZero ThE Pres0 PresAgr Indc: # գիտեմ defectve
VerbRootKnow VZero ThE ImpfAgr Indc:
VerbRootExist VZero ThA Pres0 PresAgr Indc: # կամ defectve
VerbRootExist VZero ThA ImpfAgr Indc: 

#imperfect

#U theme vowels behave haphazardly
#For optional variants, can't determine which is preferred form
:Indc VerbRootUc VZero ThU Pres0 PresAgr Indc: 
:Indc VerbRootUc VZero ThU|ThE ImpfAgr Indc:
:Indc VerbRootNulV EmptyNasal VZero ThU Pres0 PresAgr Indc: 
:Indc VerbRootNulV EmptyNasal VZero ThE ImpfAgr Indc: 
:Indc VerbRootNulC EmptyNasal VZero ThU Pres0 PresAgr Indc: 
:Indc VerbRootNulC EmptyNasal VZero ThE ImpfAgr Indc: 


PATTERN SubjunctiveIrregular
#These have an irregular indicative form that lacks prefix
VerbRootCanShort EmptyNasal VZero ThA Pres0 PresAgr Subj0 #I disagree with Boyacioglu, I have subjunctives
VerbRootCanShort EmptyNasal VZero ThA ImpfAgr Subj0
VerbRootCanLong EmptyNasal VZero ThA Pres0 PresAgr Subj0 
VerbRootCanLong EmptyNasal VZero ThA ImpfAgr Subj0  
VerbRootHave VZero ThI Pres0 PresAgr Subj0  #I disagree with Boyacioglu, I have subjunctives
VerbRootHave VZero ThI ImpfAgr Subj0 
VerbRootKnow VZero ThE Pres0 PresAgr Subj0  #I disagree with Boyacioglu, I have subjunctives
VerbRootKnow VZero ThE ImpfAgr Subj0 
VerbRootBeLongPres VZero ThA Pres0 PresAgr Subj0
VerbRootBeLongPres VZero ThA ImpfAgr Subj0
VerbRootExist VZero ThA Pres0 PresAgr Subj0	#I disagree with Boyacioglu, I have subjunctives
VerbRootExist VZero ThA ImpfAgr Subj0	


 
 #U theme vowels with C-initial segment behave haphazardly
#For optional variants, can't determine which is preferred form in some cases
#I let it overgeneralize the -e- form to negation even though the grammar only shows -u-
VerbRootUc VZero ThU|ThE Pres0 PresAgr Subj0
VerbRootUc VZero ThU|ThE ImpfAgr Subj0
VerbRootNulV EmptyNasal VZero ThU Pres0 PresAgr Subj0
VerbRootNulV EmptyNasal VZero ThU|ThE ImpfAgr Subj0 #Overgeneralize because no negative form, and not clear about -e- in complex tenses
VerbRootNulC EmptyNasal VZero  ThU  Pres0 PresAgr Subj0
VerbRootNulC EmptyNasal VZero  ThE ImpfAgr Subj0



PATTERN Past
#Past
VerbRootE VZero ThE Aor PastPrimAgr Indc0
VerbRootI VZero ThI Aor PastSecAgr Indc0 
VerbRootA VZero ThA Aor PastPrimAgr Indc0 
CausBase CausPast Aor PastPrimAgr Indc0
PassBase Pass ThI Aor PastSecAgr Indc0
InchBase InchEmpty Aor PastSecAgr Indc0


VerbRootUv VZero ThU Aor PastPrimAgr Indc0 
VerbRootUc VZero ThU Aor PastPrimAgr Indc0 
VerbRootUc VZero PastPrimAgr Indc0 #   This form can't b negated but I'll let it over-generalize
VerbRootUcanel VZero PastPrimAgr Indc0  # Dir/LR
VerbRootNulV VZero ThU PastSecAgr
VerbRootNulV VZero PastSecAgr
VerbRootNulC EmptyNasal VZero ThE Aor PastPrimAgr #Obsolete so the preference is unknown
